Utah statutes.
75-5-418.   Inventory and records.
Within 90 days after his appointment, every conservator shall prepare and file
with the appointing court a complete inventory of the estate of the protected
person together with his oath or affirmation that it is complete and accurate
so far as he is informed. The conservator shall provide a copy thereof to the
protected person if he can be located, has attained the age of 14 years, and
has sufficient mental capacity to understand these matters, and to any parent
or guardian with whom the protected person resides. The conservator shall keep
suitable records of his administration and exhibit the same on request of any
interested person.
